Utah statutes.
56-1-38.   Cabooses and locomotives -- Safety, health, and comfort rules --
Application of chapter -- Exceptions.
The provisions of Section 56-1-37 shall not apply to industrial or interplant
operations and to cabooses or yard engines used in yard movements within
switching limits having a one-way route mileage of 25 miles or less. The
provisions of this act shall not apply to cabooses or locomotives presently
operated by railroads having less than 100 miles of main and branch line
trackage; provided, however, that any additional cabooses acquired by said
railroads shall comply with all of the provisions of this act.
